Alabama, session 2026rs, SB348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
41 Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
42 following terms have the following meanings:
43 (1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Workforce.
44 (2) FACILITY. A facility where prosthetic, orthotic, or
45 pedorthic care is provided.
46 (3) NATIONAL CERTIFYING ENTITY. Any national
47 credentialing organization for ensuring the safe and effective
48 provision of orthotic, prosthetic, or pedorthic services that
49 is approved by the department, including the American Board
50 for Certification in Orthotics, Prosthetics and Pedorthics and
51 the Board of Certification/Accreditation.
52 (4) ORTHOSIS. A custom-fabricated, definitive brace or
53 support that is designed for long-term use. Except for the
54 treatment of scoliosis, the term does not include
55 prefabricated or direct-formed orthotic devices or
56 commercially available knee orthoses used following injury or
Page 2

commercially available knee orthoses used following injury or
SB348 INTRODUCED
57 surgery, upper extremity adaptive equipment, finger splints,
58 leather wrist gauntlets, face masks used following burns,
59 wheelchair seating that is an integral part of the wheelchair
60 and not worn by the patient independent of the wheelchair,
61 fabric or elastic supports, corsets, arch supports also known
62 as non-custom or prefabricated orthotics, low-temperature
63 formed plastic splints, trusses, elastic hose, canes,
64 crutches, cervical collars, dental appliances, and other
65 similar devices such as those commonly carried in stock by a
66 pharmacy, hospital, rehabilitation facility, department store,
67 corset shop, or surgical supply facility.
68 (5) ORTHOTICS. The science and practice of evaluating,
69 measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting,
70 adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial
71 training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, an orthosis
72 for the support, correction, or alleviation of neuromuscular
73 or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury, or deformity.
74 The term includes all of the following:
75 a. Evaluations, consultation, and continuing care, with
76 basic observational gait and posture analysis.
77 b. Assessing the need for and measuring, designing,
78 manufacturing, and fitting orthoses to maximize function and
79 provide the support and alignment necessary to prevent or
80 correct deformity or to improve the safety and efficiency of
81 mobility or locomotion, or both.
82 c. Periodic evaluation and consultation to assess the
83 effect of an orthosis on the patient's tissue and assure
84 proper fit and function of the orthosis.
Page 3

proper fit and function of the orthosis.
SB348 INTRODUCED
85 (6) ORTHOTIST. An individual certified by a national
86 certifying entity to practice orthotics.
87 (7) PEDORTHIC DEVICE. Custom therapeutic shoes that:
88 a. Address a medical condition of the foot below the
89 ankle;
90 b. Are prescribed by an authorized health care
91 practitioner, including diabetic shoes, for the treatment of
92 partial or complete amputation of the foot, foot ulceration,
93 pre-ulcerative callous, or foot deformity; shoe modifications
94 made for therapeutic purposes; partial foot prostheses; and
95 foot orthoses and orthoses for use from the knee and below;
96 and
97 c. Are used for the treatment or alleviation, or both,
98 of a condition that has its origin in the foot.
99 (8) PEDORTHICS. The design, manufacture, modification,
100 or fit of custom shoes, orthoses, and pedorthic devices to
101 prevent or alleviate foot problems caused by disease,
102 congenital defect, overuse, or injury.
103 (9) PEDORTHIST. An individual certified by a national
104 certifying entity to practice pedorthics.
105 (10) PROSTHESIS. A definitive artificial limb that is
106 alignable or articulated or, in lower extremity applications,
107 capable of bearing weight. The term includes an artificial
108 medical device that is not surgically implanted and that is
109 used to replace a missing limb, appendage, or other external
110 human body part and that includes an artificial limb, hand, or
111 foot. The term does not include artificial eyes, ears, dental
112 appliances, ostomy products, devices such as artificial
Page 4

appliances, ostomy products, devices such as artificial
SB348 INTRODUCED
113 breasts or eyelashes, wigs, or other devices that do not have
114 a significant impact on the musculoskeletal functions of the
115 body.
116 (11) PROSTHETICS. The science and practice of
117 evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling,
118 fitting, aligning, adjusting, or servicing, as well as
119 providing the initial education necessary to accomplish the
120 wearing and use of a prosthesis, through the replacement of
121 external parts of a human body lost due to amputation,
122 congenital deformities, or absences. The term includes all of
123 the following:
124 a. The generation of an image, form, or mold that
125 replicates the patient's body or body segment and that
126 requires rectification of dimensions, contours, and volumes
127 for use in the design and fabrication of a socket to accept a
128 residual limb to create an artificial appendage that is
129 designed either to support body weight or to improve or
130 restore function or cosmesis.
131 b. Observational gait analysis and clinical assessment
132 of the requirements necessary to refine and mechanically fix
133 the relative position of various parts of the prosthesis to
134 maximize the function, stability, and safety of the patient.
135 c. Evaluating, consulting, and providing continuing
136 patient care in order to assess the effect of the prosthetic
137 device on the patient's tissues and to assure proper fit and
138 function of the prosthetic device.
139 (12) PROSTHETIST. An individual who is certified by a
140 national certifying entity to practice prosthetics.
Page 5

national certifying entity to practice prosthetics.
SB348 INTRODUCED
141 (b) Beginning October 1, 2026, a prosthetist,
142 orthotist, pedorthist, fitter, assistant, or facility may not
143 provide prosthetic, orthotic, or pedorthic care, or otherwise
144 practice or operate, without a current and valid certification
145 from a national certifying entity.
146 (c)(1) All persons required to be certified pursuant to
147 subsection (b) shall annually submit proof of valid
148 certification to the department. The department shall keep a
149 record of all certified persons and verify and record all
150 certified individual's completed continuing education required
151 by the national certifying entity.
152 (2) The department may assess an annual recording fee
153 on certified persons not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).
154 (3) All funds collected by the department pursuant to
155 this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the
156 credit of the department to be used to administer this
157 section.
158 (d)(1) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class C
159 misdemeanor.
160 (2) The Attorney General may bring an action in circuit
161 court to enjoin a violation of this section.
162 Section 2. Chapter 25A of Title 34, Code of Alabama
163 1975, establishing the Alabama State Board of Prosthetists and
164 Orthotists, is repealed.
165 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
166 1, 2026.
Page 6